Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2636.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in Penn Township, Snyder County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Governor, is hereby authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to Penn Township Municipal Authority certain lands situate in Penn Township, Snyder County, that is to be subdivided from Tax Parcel 13-07-036 as referenced in Deed Book 52, Page 144 for the fair market value of $63,000.(b) Property description.--The property to be conveyed under subsection (a) consists of approximately 5.2988 acres and improvements thereon bounded and more particularly described as follows:All that certain piece, parcel, and lot of land situate in 12345678910111213141516171819 Penn Township, Snyder County, Pennsylvania and shown upon a subdivision plan as Proposed Lot 1 by Larson Design Group, file 5320-021, bounded and described as follows;Commencing at an existing iron pin on the northerly line of lands of Penn Township Municipal Authority (Tax Parcel 13-03-251A), said iron pin also being on a southerly line of lands of Penn Township Road Supervisors (Tax Parcel 13-03-026); Thence along said Tax Parcel 13-03-026, S 88° 21' 35" W, 50.74' to the southeasterly corner of T-503 (Gaugler Lane);Thence along said T-503 by the following two (2) courses and distances:1. N 16° 06' 59" W, 40.00' to a point; 2. S 73° 53' 01" W, 33.05' to a set iron pin at the southeasterly corner of the parcel herein described, said iron pin also being the true point and place of beginning;Thence from the point and place of beginning and continuing along the northerly line of said T-503, S 73° 53' 01' W, 460.00' to a set iron pin;Thence through the lands of the Grantor by the following three (3) courses and distances:1. N 16° 06' 59" W, 501.77' to a set iron pin;2. N 73° 53' 01" E, 460.00' to a set iron pin;S 16° 06' 59" E, 501.77' to the point and place of beginning.CONTAINING 5.2988-acres, more or less.(c) Subject to certain matters.--The conveyance shall be made under and subject to all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies 20260HB2636PN3602 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Prohibited use.--Any conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee, its successors and assigns. Should the grantee, its successors or assigns, permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Covenants, conditions and restrictions.--The Secretary of General Services may include in the deed of conveyance any covenants, conditions or restrictions on the property as determined to be in the best interests of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(f) Restrictive covenants.--Any conveyance authorized under this section shall be made under and subject to the condition that Penn Township Municipal Authority, its successors and assigns, shall use the property solely for a municipal well site. Should Penn Township Municipal Authority, its successors or assigns use the property for any other purpose, the property, shall, at the Department of General Service's election, revert and revest to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(g) Easements.--The Department of General Services is hereby authorized, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, to grant any easements benefiting the property to be conveyed, or 20260HB2636PN3602 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to retain any easements from the property to be conveyed, as the Secretary of General Services shall determine to be necessary or appropriate.(h) Deed.--The conveyance shall be made by a special warranty deed to be executed by the Secretary of General Services in the name of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania.(i) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(j) Expiration.--In the event this conveyance is not completed within 18 months after the effective date of this subsection, the authority contained herein shall expire.(k) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized by this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2636PN3602 - 4 - 123456789101112131415